Mississippi, session 2026, SB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature finds that the United States Dollar has had an average inflation rate of two and six-tenths percent (2.6%) per year between 2004 and today. (2)  The Legislature further finds that the average inflation rate has produced a cumulative price increase of sixty-seven and two one-hundredths percent (67.02%). (3)  The Legislature further finds that one (1) United States dollar in 2004 is equivalent in purchasing power to approximately One Dollar and Sixty-seven Cents ($1.67) today. SECTION 2.  Section 11-1-60, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 11-1-60.  (1) For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonpecuniary damages arising from death, pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, worry, emotional distress, loss of society and companionship, loss of consortium, bystander injury, physical impairment, disfigurement, injury to reputation, humiliation, embarrassment, loss of the enjoyment of life, hedonic damages, other nonpecuniary damages, and any other theory of damages such as fear of loss, illness or injury.  The term "noneconomic damages" shall not include punitive or exemplary damages. (b)  "Actual economic damages" means objectively verifiable pecuniary damages arising from medical expenses and medical care, rehabilitation services, custodial care, disabilities, loss of earnings and earning capacity, loss of income, burial costs, loss of use of property, costs of repair or replacement of property, costs of obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, loss of business or employment opportunities, and other objectively verifiable monetary losses. (2)  (a)  In any cause of action filed on or after September 1, 2004, for injury based on malpractice or breach of standard of care against a provider of health care, including institutions for the aged or infirm, in the event the trier of fact finds the defendant liable, they shall not award the plaintiff more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for noneconomic damages. (b)  In any civil action filed on or after September 1, 2004, other than those actions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, in the event the trier of fact finds the defendant liable, they shall not award the plaintiff more than * * * One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) for noneconomic damages. It is the intent of this section to limit all noneconomic damages to the above. (c)  The trier of fact shall not be advised of the limitations imposed by this subsection (2) and the judge shall appropriately reduce any award of noneconomic damages that exceeds the applicable limitation. (3)  Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed as creating a cause of action or as setting forth elements of or types of damages that are or are not recoverable in any type of cause of action. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.